District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1976

Appropriation for summer school salaries.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 508, Pub. L. 93-140, § 22
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 13, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1142.
1973 Ed., § 31-1542a.